lexd_components/hyw-names_bible.lexd
LEXICON NounCountryUnreducible
Աբանա:Աբանա
Աբարիմ:Աբարիմ
Աբելին:Աբելին
Աբելմաուլա:Աբելմաուլա
Աբենեզեր:Աբենեզեր
Աբեսդոմմին:Աբեսդոմմին
Աբէլ:Աբէլ
Աբէլ-բեթ-մաաքա:Աբէլ-բեթ-մաաքա
Աբէլմայիմ:Աբէլմայիմ
Աբէլմաուլա:Աբէլմաուլա
Աբէլմիսրաիմ:Աբէլմիսրաիմ
Աբէլսատիմ:Աբէլսատիմ
Աբէլքերամիմ:Աբէլքերամիմ
Աբէս:Աբէս
Ադադ-ռիմմօն:Ադադ-ռիմմօն
Ադադա:Ադադա
Ադամա:Ադամա
Ադամի-նագեբ:Ադամի-նագեբ
Ադասա:Ադասա
Ադարովդ:Ադարովդ
Ադարովթ:Ադարովթ
Ադդան:Ադդան
Ադդօն:Ադդօն
Ադմա:Ադմա
Ադորայիմ:Ադորայիմ
Ադրամինտ:Ադրամինտ
Ադրիական:Ադրիական
Ազանօթ-թաբօր:Ազանօթ-թաբօր
Ազեկա:Ազեկա
Ազովտոս:Ազովտոս
Աթարիմ:Աթարիմ
Աթաք:Աթաք
Աթէնք:Աթէնք
Ալամելէք:Ալամելէք
Ալօն:Ալօն
Ալօն-բախութ:Ալօն-բախութ
Ակեղդամա:Ակեղդամա
Ակկարոն:Ակկարոն
Ակրաբիմ:Ակրաբիմ
Ակքով:Ակքով
Ահավա:Ահավա
Աղուղ:Աղուղ
Ամադ:Ամադ
Ամաթ:Ամաթ
Ամաղէկ:Ամաղէկ
Ամամ:Ամամ
Ամանա:Ամանա
Ամմա:Ամմա
Ամփիպօլիս:Ամփիպօլիս
Այեղոն:Այեղոն
Այենոն:Այենոն
Ային:Ային
Այծեմանց:Այծեմանց
Անաբ:Անաբ
Անաթովթ:Անաթովթ
Անամ:Անամ
Անանայէլ:Անանայէլ
Անարէթ:Անարէթ
Անէր:Անէր
Անիմ:Անիմ
Անտիոք:Անտիոք
Անտիպատրիս:Անտիպատրիս
Առնոն:Առնոն
Ասալ:Ասալ
Ասան:Ասան
Ասասանթամար:Ասասանթամար
Ասար-ադդար:Ասար-ադդար
Ասար-ենան:Ասար-ենան
Ասար-սուաղ:Ասար-սուաղ
Ասարենան:Ասարենան
Ասեդիմ:Ասեդիմ
Ասեդոթ:Ասեդոթ
Ասեդովթ:Ասեդովթ
Ասեդովթ-փասգա:Ասեդովթ-փասգա
Ասեմ:Ասեմ
Ասեմոն:Ասեմոն
Ասեր-սուաղ:Ասեր-սուաղ
Ասեր-սուսա:Ասեր-սուսա
Ասեր-սուսիմ:Ասեր-սուսիմ
Ասերգադդա:Ասերգադդա
Ասերովթ:Ասերովթ
Ասէմ:Ասէմ
Ասիմաթ:Ասիմաթ
Ասիս:Ասիս
Ասկալոն:Ասկալոն
Ասկաղոն:Ասկաղոն
Ասնա:Ասնա
Ասոն:Ասոն
Ասորեստան:Ասորեստան
Ասորիք:Ասորիք
Ասուրի:Ասուրի
Աստարովթ:Աստարովթ
Աստարովթ-Կառնայիմ:Աստարովթ-Կառնայիմ
Ասքանաս:Ասքանաս
Ատարովթ:Ատարովթ
Ատարօթ-ադար:Ատարօթ-ադար
Ատիթայիմ:Ատիթայիմ
Ատրօթ-սովփան:Ատրօթ-սովփան
Ար:Ար
Արաբա:Արաբա
Արաբաթ:Արաբաթ
Արարատ:Արարատ
Արարովթ:Արարովթ
Արբա:Արբա
Արգովբ:Արգովբ
Արեգ:Արեգ
Արես:Արես
Արեք:Արեք
Արիմաթեմ-սօփիմ:Արիմաթեմ-սօփիմ
Արիսպագոս:Արիսպագոս
Արիսօթ:Արիսօթ
Արմագեդոն:Արմագեդոն
Արոեր:Արոեր
Արոէր:Արոէր
Արուադ:Արուադ
Արումա:Արումա
Արփադ:Արփադ
Արփաթ:Արփաթ
Արքիատարօթ:Արքիատարօթ
Աւա:Աւա
Աւեն:Աւեն
Աւիթ:Աւիթ
Աւիմ:Աւիմ
Աւրան:Աւրան
Ափեկ:Ափեկ
Ափեկա:Ափեկա
Ափեսդոմմի:Ափեսդոմմի
Ափերէմ:Ափերէմ
Ափէկ:Ափէկ
Աքադ:Աքադ
Աքեզիբ:Աքեզիբ
Աքղապ:Աքղապ
Աքովր:Աքովր
Աքսափ:Աքսափ
Բաալօթ:Բաալօթ
Բաաղ:Բաաղ
Բաաղա:Բաաղա
Բաաղամոն:Բաաղամոն
Բաաղգադ:Բաաղգադ
Բաաղեթ:Բաաղեթ
Բաաղէթ-բէէր:Բաաղէթ-բէէր
Բաաղհասոր:Բաաղհասոր
Բաաղհերմոն:Բաաղհերմոն
Բաաղփարաս:Բաաղփարաս
Բաան:Բաան
Բաբիլոն:Բաբիլոն
Բազէս:Բազէս
Բազկաթ:Բազկաթ
Բաթ-րաբբիմ:Բաթ-րաբբիմ
Բաթուէլ:Բաթուէլ
Բաթուլ:Բաթուլ
Բահաղ-սաղիսա:Բահաղ-սաղիսա
Բամոթ-բահաղ:Բամոթ-բահաղ
Բամօթ:Բամօթ
Բանէ-բարակ:Բանէ-բարակ
Բանէ-յական:Բանէ-յական
Բառնեա:Բառնեա
Բասան:Բասան
Բասան-հաւօթ-յայիր:Բասան-հաւօթ-յայիր
Բարաթոն:Բարաթոն
Բաւուրիմ:Բաւուրիմ
Բեեստարա:Բեեստարա
Բեզեկ:Բեզեկ
Բեթաբարա:Բեթաբարա
Բեթագղա:Բեթագղա
Բեթակադ:Բեթակադ
Բեթահ:Բեթահ
Բեթամէկ:Բեթամէկ
Բեթանաթ:Բեթանաթ
Բեթանովթ:Բեթանովթ
Բեթասետա:Բեթասետա
Բեթարաբա:Բեթարաբա
Բեթարամ:Բեթարամ
Բեթարան:Բեթարան
Բեթարբէլ:Բեթարբէլ
Բեթաւան:Բեթաւան
Բեթափրա:Բեթափրա
Բեթաքարմա:Բեթաքարմա
Բեթբարա:Բեթբարա
Բեթբարէ:Բեթբարէ
Բեթգաղգաղա:Բեթգաղգաղա
Բեթգամովղ:Բեթգամովղ
Բեթդագոն:Բեթդագոն
Բեթդէբլաթեմ:Բեթդէբլաթեմ
Բեթեսել:Բեթեսել
Բեթեսիմօթ:Բեթեսիմօթ
Բեթէլ:Բեթէլ
Բեթթափուա:Բեթթափուա
Բեթլաբաւովթ:Բեթլաբաւովթ
Բեթլէհէմ:Բեթլէհէմ
Բեթհամերհագ:Բեթհամերհագ
Բեթմարքաբովթ:Բեթմարքաբովթ
Բեթմաւոն:Բեթմաւոն
Բեթնամրա:Բեթնամրա
Բեթորոն:Բեթորոն
Բեթսա:Բեթսա
Բեթսամիւս:Բեթսամիւս
Բեթսայիդա:Բեթսայիդա
Բեթսան:Բեթսան
Բեթրոն:Բեթրոն
Բեթրոոբ:Բեթրոոբ
Բեթփագէ:Բեթփագէ
Բեթփաղէթ:Բեթփաղէթ
Բեթփասես:Բեթփասես
Բեթփեգովր:Բեթփեգովր
Բենհեսեդ:Բենհեսեդ
Բետէն:Բետէն
Բերելիմ:Բերելիմ
Բերիմով:Բերիմով
Բերոթ-բանէ-յական:Բերոթ-բանէ-յական
Բերոթա:Բերոթա
Բերովթ:Բերովթ
Բերսաբէէ:Բերսաբէէ
Բէան:Բէան
Բէեղսեփոն:Բէեղսեփոն
Բէէլմոն:Բէէլմոն
Բէթբէէլմօն:Բէթբէէլմօն
Բէթմաաքա:Բէթմաաքա
Բէիր:Բէիր
Բոսրա:Բոսրա
Բոտանիմ:Բոտանիմ
Բուբաստ:Բուբաստ
Բոքիմ:Բոքիմ
Բօսրա:Բօսրա
Գաաս:Գաաս
Գաբա:Գաբա
Գաբաա:Գաբաա
Գաբաաթ:Գաբաաթ
Գաբաթոն:Գաբաթոն
Գաբաւոն:Գաբաւոն
Գաբաւօն:Գաբաւօն
Գադգադ:Գադգադ
Գադեր:Գադեր
Գադերա:Գադերա
Գադերօթ:Գադերօթ
Գադերօթայիմ:Գադերօթայիմ
Գազա:Գազա
Գազեր:Գազեր
Գալիլեա:Գալիլեա
Գալիլովթ:Գալիլովթ
Գաղաադ:Գաղաադ
Գաղգաղա:Գաղգաղա
Գաղեմէթ:Գաղեմէթ
Գաղեմէթ:Գաղեմէթ
Գաղէր:Գաղէր
Գաղղիմ:Գաղղիմ
Գաղմոն:Գաղմոն
Գամզով:Գամզով
Գայի:Գայի
Գասիոնգաբեր:Գասիոնգաբեր
Գարեբ:Գարեբ
Գարիզին:Գարիզին
Գեբազ:Գեբազ
Գեբաղ:Գեբաղ
Գեբիմ:Գեբիմ
Գեդոմ:Գեդոմ
Գեդովր:Գեդովր
Գեթ:Գեթ
Գեթթայիմ:Գեթթայիմ
Գեթսեմանի:Գեթսեմանի
Գեթրեմօն:Գեթրեմօն
Գեթքոփեր:Գեթքոփեր
Գելմոն-դէբլաթէմ:Գելմոն-դէբլաթէմ
Գեհոն:Գեհոն
Գեղբուէ:Գեղբուէ
Գեղոն:Գեղոն
Գեննեսարէթ:Գեննեսարէթ
Գեսեմ:Գեսեմ
Գեսուր:Գեսուր
Գերար:Գերար
Գերարա:Գերարա
Գերեր:Գերեր
Գէբուլ:Գէբուլ
Գէթ:Գէթ
Գէլմոն-դէբլաթէմ:Գէլմոն-դէբլաթէմ
Գիբաթհաարալօթ:Գիբաթհաարալօթ
Գոաթ:Գոաթ
Գողգոթա:Գողգոթա
Գոմոր:Գոմոր
Գոյիմ:Գոյիմ
Գոսոմ:Գոսոմ
Գովբ:Գովբ
Գովզան:Գովզան
Գովղան:Գովղան
Գուր:Գուր
Գուր-բահաղ:Գուր-բահաղ
Դաբասէթ:Դաբասէթ
Դաբարաթ:Դաբարաթ
Դաբիր:Դաբիր
Դաղաան:Դաղաան
Դաղմանութա:Դաղմանութա
Դամասկոս:Դամասկոս
Դանաեաան:Դանաեաան
Դաննա:Դաննա
Դափկայ:Դափկայ
Դեբոն:Դեբոն
Դեբոնգադ:Դեբոնգադ
Դեկապոլիս:Դեկապոլիս
Դեմնա:Դեմնա
Դենհաբա:Դենհաբա
Դեննաբա:Դեննաբա
Դերբէ:Դերբէ
Դէմօնա:Դէմօնա
Դիբլաթ:Դիբլաթ
Դիմոն:Դիմոն
Դովր:Դովր
Դումա:Դումա
Դուրա:Դուրա
Դօթայիմ:Դօթայիմ
Եբրայեցի:Եբրայեցի
Եբրօն:Եբրօն
Եբրօնա:Եբրօնա
Եգիպտոս:Եգիպտոս
Եգլայիմ:Եգլայիմ
Եդեմ:Եդեմ
Եդեր:Եդեր
Եդոմ:Եդոմ
Եդովմ:Եդովմ
Եդովմին:Եդովմին
Եդրայի:Եդրայի
Եզել:Եզել
Եէկար-սահադութա:Եէկար-սահադութա
Եթամ:Եթամ
Եթեր:Եթեր
Եթլօն:Եթլօն
Եթսեմով:Եթսեմով
Ելաթ:Ելաթ
Ելամ:Ելամ
Ելթեկէ:Ելթեկէ
Ելթեկոն:Ելթեկոն
Ելլադա:Ելլադա
Ելլասար:Ելլասար
Ելփա:Ելփա
Ելօն:Ելօն
Ելօն-բեթանան:Ելօն-բեթանան
Եկբատանա:Եկբատանա
Եհովա-շամմա:Եհովա-շամմա
Եհովայ-շալօմ:Եհովայ-շալօմ
Եհովանիսի:Եհովանիսի
Եհուդ:Եհուդ
Եղամ:Եղամ
Եղէաղէ:Եղէաղէ
Եղիմ:Եղիմ
Եղուս:Եղուս
Եմաթ:Եմաթ
Եմաթդովր:Եմաթդովր
Եմեկկասիս:Եմեկկասիս
Ենաթօն:Ենաթօն
Ենայիմ:Ենայիմ
Ենգադդի:Ենգադդի
Ենգանիմ:Ենգանիմ
Ենդովր:Ենդովր
Ենեգլայիմ:Ենեգլայիմ
Ենհասոր:Ենհասոր
Ենովմ:Ենովմ
Ենռեմոն:Ենռեմոն
Ենսամիւս:Ենսամիւս
Ենքադդա:Ենքադդա
Եսան:Եսան
Եսբոն:Եսբոն
Եսեբոն:Եսեբոն
Եսեմոն:Եսեմոն
Եսեփոն:Եսեփոն
Եսթաւուղ:Եսթաւուղ
Եսթեմով:Եսթեմով
Եսիմոն:Եսիմոն
Եսրոն:Եսրոն
Ետամ:Ետամ
Ետեբա:Ետեբա
Ետեբաթա:Ետեբաթա
Երեբ:Երեբ
Երիքով:Երիքով
Երուսաղէմ:Երուսաղէմ
Եւիլա:Եւիլա
Եփեսոս:Եփեսոս
Եփրա:Եփրա
Եփրաթա:Եփրաթա
Եփրայեմ:Եփրայեմ
Եփրատ:Եփրատ
Եքեղա:Եքեղա
Զանով:Զանով
Զարեդ:Զարեդ
Զեփրոն:Զեփրոն
Զիփ:Զիփ
Զոողեթ:Զոողեթ
Էգլաթ-:Էգլաթ-
Շելիշան:Շելիշան
Էգղոն:Էգղոն
Էդովմին:Էդովմին
Էլ-Բեթէլ:Էլ-Բեթէլ
Էլ-Էլօհէ-Իսրայէլ:Էլ-Էլօհէ-Իսրայէլ
Էլամ:Էլամ
Էլէփ:Էլէփ
Էլթուղադ:Էլթուղադ
Էլթուղաթ:Էլթուղաթ
Էլփառան:Էլփառան
Էմմաուս:Էմմաուս
Էնգանիմ:Էնգանիմ
Էնմասեփաթ:Էնմասեփաթ
Թաբօր:Թաբօր
Թադմօր:Թադմօր
Թահթիմադասէ:Թահթիմադասէ
Թամնա:Թամնա
Թամնաթ-հարես:Թամնաթ-հարես
Թամնաթ-սարա:Թամնաթ-սարա
Թամնաթա:Թամնաթա
Թանաք:Թանաք
Թարաղա:Թարաղա
Թարթակ:Թարթակ
Թարսիս:Թարսիս
Թափուա:Թափուա
Թափսա:Թափսա
Թափօր:Թափօր
Թեբէս:Թեբէս
Թելաբիբ:Թելաբիբ
Թելասար:Թելասար
Թեկուէ:Թեկուէ
Թեղարսա:Թեղարսա
Թեղմեղա:Թեղմեղա
Թեման:Թեման
Թեսաղոնիկէ:Թեսաղոնիկէ
Թերեսա:Թերեսա
Թերսա:Թերսա
Թէանաթսելով:Թէանաթսելով
Թէբէս:Թէբէս
Թիս:Թիս
Թիւատիր:Թիւատիր
Թոբէլ:Թոբէլ
Թորգոմա:Թորգոմա
Թուղադ:Թուղադ
Թոքան:Թոքան
Իթագաս:Իթագաս
Իկոնիոն:Իկոնիոն
Իյէ-աբարիմ:Իյէ-աբարիմ
Իյիմ:Իյիմ
Իյօն:Իյօն
Իստովբ:Իստովբ
Իտուրա:Իտուրա
Իրսամէս:Իրսամէս
Լաբաովթ:Լաբաովթ
Լադաբար:Լադաբար
Լակում:Լակում
Լահայ-րօ:Լահայ-րօ
Լամաս:Լամաս
Լայիս:Լայիս
Լասարօն:Լասարօն
Լաւոդիկէ:Լաւոդիկէ
Լաքիս:Լաքիս
Լեբնա:Լեբնա
Լեսեմ:Լեսեմ
Լեքի:Լեքի
Լիբանան:Լիբանան
Լիւստրա:Լիւստրա
Լուզ:Լուզ
Խառան:Խառան
Կաբեսէէլ:Կաբեսէէլ
Կաբիսէլ:Կաբիսէլ
Կաբսեմ:Կաբսեմ
Կադեմօթ:Կադեմօթ
Կադէս:Կադէս
Կադէս-բառնեայ:Կադէս-բառնեայ
Կամօն:Կամօն
Կային:Կային
Կանա:Կանա
Կանաթ:Կանաթ
Կատտաթ:Կատտաթ
Կարթան:Կարթան
Կարիաթ:Կարիաթ
Կարիաթ-արբա:Կարիաթ-արբա
Կարիաթ-բաաղ:Կարիաթ-բաաղ
Կարիաթ-հուսովթ:Կարիաթ-հուսովթ
Կարիաթ-սեփեր:Կարիաթ-սեփեր
Կարիաթարիմ:Կարիաթարիմ
Կարիաթեմ:Կարիաթեմ
Կարիօթ:Կարիօթ
Կարկա:Կարկա
Կարկար:Կարկար
Կարմեղոս:Կարմեղոս
Կարմէլ:Կարմէլ
Կափառնայում:Կափառնայում
Կափթոր:Կափթոր
Կեդրոն:Կեդրոն
Կեսիօն:Կեսիօն
Կեփիրա:Կեփիրա
Կէէլաթա:Կէէլաթա
Կէիլա:Կէիլա
Կէիլայի:Կէիլայի
Կէիլայիցը:Կէիլայիցը
Կէիլան:Կէիլան
Կիբրօթ-հաթթաւայ:Կիբրօթ-հաթթաւայ
Կինա:Կինա
Կիպրոս:Կիպրոս
Կիսոն:Կիսոն
Կիտիմ:Կիտիմ
Կիր:Կիր
Կիր-հարէսէթ:Կիր-հարէսէթ
Կիրհարես:Կիրհարես
Կիւրեն:Կիւրեն
Կիւրենէ:Կիւրենէ
Կղօդա:Կղօդա
Կնիդ:Կնիդ
Կոբա:Կոբա
Կողոսա:Կողոսա
Կորնթոս:Կորնթոս
Կրետէ:Կրետէ
Հադէս:Հադէս
Հադիդ:Հադիդ
Հադրաք:Հադրաք
Համ:Համ
Համմօն:Համմօն
Համոնա:Համոնա
Հանէս:Հանէս
Հասմօնա:Հասմօնա
Հասոր:Հասոր
Հարա:Հարա
Հարար:Հարար
Հարեթ:Հարեթ
Հարէմ:Հարէմ
Հարէս:Հարէս
Հարսութ:Հարսութ
Հարօդ:Հարօդ
Հաւօթ-յայիր:Հաւօթ-յայիր
Հելէփ:Հելէփ
Հեղդա:Հեղդա
Հերմոն:Հերմոն
Հնդկաստան:Հնդկաստան
Հովր:Հովր
Հորգադգադ:Հորգադգադ
Հուկօկ:Հուկօկ
Հոփնի:Հոփնի
Հռեգիոն:Հռեգիոն
Հռոդոն:Հռոդոն
Հռովմ:Հռովմ
Հրէաստան:Հրէաստան
Հօրմա:Հօրմա
Ձիթենեաց:Ձիթենեաց
Ղասան:Ղասան
Ղասեա:Ղասեա
Ղեբօնա:Ղեբօնա
Ղոբան:Ղոբան
Ղովդ:Ղովդ
Ղուիթ:Ղուիթ
Մաարաթ:Մաարաթ
Մագդաղգադ:Մագդաղգադ
Մագդաղէ:Մագդաղէ
Մագդող:Մագդող
Մագոգ:Մագոգ
Մագրոն:Մագրոն
Մադդին:Մադդին
Մադիամ:Մադիամ
Մադմաննա:Մադմաննա
Մադմենա:Մադմենա
Մադմէն:Մադմէն
Մադօն:Մադօն
Մաթանա:Մաթանա
Մակդաղիէլ:Մակդաղիէլ
Մակեդ:Մակեդ
Մակեդա:Մակեդա
Մակեդդով:Մակեդդով
Մահանէ-դան:Մահանէ-դան
Մամբրէ:Մամբրէ
Մանայիմ:Մանայիմ
Մաոն:Մաոն
Մաուլ:Մաուլ
Մառօն:Մառօն
Մասաղ:Մասաղ
Մասգաբ:Մասգաբ
Մասենա:Մասենա
Մասեփա:Մասեփա
Մասոր:Մասոր
Մասսա:Մասսա
Մասրեկա:Մասրեկա
Մասրեփօթ-մայիմ:Մասրեփօթ-մայիմ
Մասփա:Մասփա
Մատեկա:Մատեկա
Մարաղա:Մարաղա
Մարաստան:Մարաստան
Մարեսա:Մարեսա
Մարովզ:Մարովզ
Մարօթ:Մարօթ
Մափկաթ:Մափկաթ
Մաքաս:Մաքաս
Մաքթես:Մաքթես
Մաքմաս:Մաքմաս
Մաքմեթաթ:Մաքմեթաթ
Մաքփելա:Մաքփելա
Մեդաբա:Մեդաբա
Մեթեկամմա:Մեթեկամմա
Մելիտէ:Մելիտէ
Մելիտոս:Մելիտոս
Մելօն:Մելօն
Մեմփիս:Մեմփիս
Մեննիթ:Մեննիթ
Մեռա:Մեռա
Մերաթայիմ:Մերաթայիմ
Մերիբա:Մերիբա
Մերոնոթ:Մերոնոթ
Մեփայաթ:Մեփայաթ
Մեքոնա:Մեքոնա
Մեքուրա:Մեքուրա
Մէա:Մէա
Մէարա:Մէարա
Մէարկօն:Մէարկօն
Մէօնէնիմ:Մէօնէնիմ
Միդդալ-եդեր:Միդդալ-եդեր
Միլետոս:Միլետոս
Միննի:Միննի
Միջագետ:Միջագետ
Միռա:Միռա
Միտիլինէ:Միտիլինէ
Մոսա:Մոսա
Մովաբ:Մովաբ
Մօլադա:Մօլադա
Մօսերօթ:Մօսերօթ
Մօսէրա:Մօսէրա
Մօրեսեթ:Մօրեսեթ
Մօրէ:Մօրէ
Յաբիս:Յաբիս
Յաբնէ:Յաբնէ
Յաբնէլ:Յաբնէլ
Յաբոկ:Յաբոկ
Յագուր:Յագուր
Յադելա:Յադելա
Յազեր:Յազեր
Յաթիր:Յաթիր
Յայիր:Յայիր
Յանովէ:Յանովէ
Յանում:Յանում
Յասսա:Յասսա
Յարիմ:Յարիմ
Յարուփ:Յարուփ
Յարօն:Յարօն
Յափիէ:Յափիէ
Յեբղաամ:Յեբղաամ
Յեբուս:Յեբուս
Յեզրայէլ:Յեզրայէլ
Յեթլա:Յեթլա
Յեթնան:Յեթնան
Յեկդաամ:Յեկդաամ
Յեկթովէլ:Յեկթովէլ
Յեկմամ:Յեկմամ
Յեկնամ:Յեկնամ
Յեսանա:Յեսանա
Յեսուա:Յեսուա
Յեսուրուն:Յեսուրուն
Յետտա:Յետտա
Յերապօլիս:Յերապօլիս
Յերիմութ:Յերիմութ
Յերուէլ:Յերուէլ
Յերուսաղէմ:Յերուսաղէմ
Յերփայէլ:Յերփայէլ
Յեփալթի:Յեփալթի
Յեփթա:Յեփթա
Յեփթայէլ:Յեփթայէլ
Յոգբէհա:Յոգբէհա
Յոպպէ:Յոպպէ
Յորդանան:Յորդանան
Յունաստան:Յունաստան
Նաալիէլ:Նաալիէլ
Նաաղօլ:Նաաղօլ
Նաամա:Նաամա
Նաարա:Նաարա
Նաբաւ:Նաբաւ
Նազարէթ:Նազարէթ
Նամրա:Նամրա
Նայիդ:Նայիդ
Նային:Նային
Նաւաթ:Նաւաթ
Նափթովա:Նափթովա
Նաքոն:Նաքոն
Նեբաղատ:Նեբաղատ
Նեբաս:Նեբաս
Նեբսան:Նեբսան
Նեղոս:Նեղոս
Նեմերիմ:Նեմերիմ
Նեսիբ:Նեսիբ
Ներգաղ:Ներգաղ
Նեփթուք:Նեփթուք
Նէապոլիս:Նէապոլիս
Նէթայիմ:Նէթայիմ
Նէիէլ:Նէիէլ
Նիկոպօլիս:Նիկոպօլիս
Նինուէ:Նինուէ
Նոբ:Նոբ
Նոբահ:Նոբահ
Նով:Նով
Նով-ամոն:Նով-ամոն
Նուա:Նուա
Նոփա:Նոփա
Շաբա:Շաբա
Շաւէ:Շաւէ
Շով:Շով
Շուշան:Շուշան
Ոբովթ:Ոբովթ
Ոդողոմ:Ոդողոմ
Ոզան-Սէէրա:Ոզան-Սէէրա
Ոթոմ:Ոթոմ
Ովգ:Ովգ
Ովնով:Ովնով
Որոնայիմ:Որոնայիմ
Ուլա:Ուլա
Ուսա:Ուսա
Ուր:Ուր
Ոփազ:Ոփազ
Ոփաղ:Ոփաղ
Ոփեր:Ոփեր
Ոփիր:Ոփիր
Պաթուրես:Պաթուրես
Պատարա:Պատարա
Պատիողոս:Պատիողոս
Պատմոս:Պատմոս
Պարթեւստան:Պարթեւստան
Պափոս:Պափոս
Պերգամոն:Պերգամոն
Պերգէ:Պերգէ
Պոնտոս:Պոնտոս
Ռաբբա:Ռաբբա
Ռաբբիդ:Ռաբբիդ
Ռաթամա:Ռաթամա
Ռակկոն:Ռակկոն
Ռահաբ:Ռահաբ
Ռամա:Ռամա
Ռամաթ:Ռամաթ
Ռամաթ-լէքի:Ռամաթ-լէքի
Ռամովթ:Ռամովթ
Ռամովթ-գաղաադ:Ռամովթ-գաղաադ
Ռամսես:Ռամսես
Ռափա:Ռափա
Ռափիդիմ:Ռափիդիմ
Ռեբղա:Ռեբղա
Ռեկկաթ:Ռեկկաթ
Ռեմոն:Ռեմոն
Ռեմօն-մեթօար:Ռեմօն-մեթօար
Ռեմօն-Փարէս:Ռեմօն-Փարէս
Ռեսսա:Ռեսսա
Ռէկեմ:Ռէկեմ
Ռէսէն:Ռէսէն
Ռիմմօն:Ռիմմօն
Ռոբովթ:Ռոբովթ
Ռովգել:Ռովգել
Ռովգելիմ:Ռովգելիմ
Ռովդել:Ռովդել
Սաանան:Սաանան
Սաարա:Սաարա
Սաբա:Սաբա
Սաբէէ:Սաբէէ
Սագարիմ:Սագարիմ
Սալեքադ:Սալեքադ
Սաղաբիմ:Սաղաբիմ
Սաղաբին:Սաղաբին
Սաղամինա:Սաղամինա
Սաղէմ:Սաղէմ
Սաղիմ:Սաղիմ
Սաղիսա:Սաղիսա
Սաղմա:Սաղմա
Սաղմոնա:Սաղմոնա
Սաղմօն:Սաղմօն
Սամա:Սամա
Սամիր:Սամիր
Սամոս:Սամոս
Սամրօն:Սամրօն
Սամօթրակէ:Սամօթրակէ
Սայիր:Սայիր
Սանանիմ:Սանանիմ
Սանիր:Սանիր
Սանսաննա:Սանսաննա
Սասիմա:Սասիմա
Սատիմ:Սատիմ
Սարաա:Սարաա
Սարդէս:Սարդէս
Սարեդա:Սարեդա
Սարեթ-սահառ:Սարեթ-սահառ
Սարերա:Սարերա
Սարեփթա:Սարեփթա
Սարթան:Սարթան
Սարիդ:Սարիդ
Սարիօն:Սարիօն
Սարուհէն:Սարուհէն
Սարօն:Սարօն
Սափիր:Սափիր
Սափոն:Սափոն
Սաքարօն:Սաքարօն
Սաքքովթ-բանովթ:Սաքքովթ-բանովթ
Սեբամա:Սեբամա
Սեբարիմ:Սեբարիմ
Սեբոյիմ:Սեբոյիմ
Սեգովր:Սեգովր
Սեդադ:Սեդադ
Սելա:Սելա
Սելմօն:Սելմօն
Սելմօնա:Սելմօնա
Սելով:Սելով
Սելովամ:Սելովամ
Սելսահ:Սելսահ
Սելքա:Սելքա
Սեմարացի:Սեմարացի
